Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. Licensing

§ 3061.
Issuance and revocation.

The selectboard members may license for one year, or a less time, suitable persons to keep restaurants, or other places dispensing food or drink to the public, and inns or hotels in their respective towns, and may revoke such licenses granted by them or by their predecessors when the public good requires it. This subsection shall not apply to homes catering to tourists, tearooms, or tourist camps.

The judges of the Superior Court may grant licenses to keep inns or hotels in unorganized towns and gores in their respective counties and may revoke the same when the public good so requires.

A person who keeps an inn, hotel, restaurant, or other place dispensing food or drink to the public without a license, when one is required, as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall be fined not less than $10.00 nor more than $50.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3062.
Recording of license and revocation of license.

Licenses granted by the selectboard members shall be signed by a majority of them and shall not be effectual until recorded in the office of the clerk of the town.
The expense of recording shall be paid by the person receiving the same, but a charge shall not be made to the person for such license.
If such license is revoked, a certificate thereof shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the town and notice given to the person holding the same.

§ 3063.
Revocation by assistant judges of Superior Court.

If the selectboard members do not revoke a license granted by them when the public good so requires, the assistant judges of the Superior Court may vacate the same on application of the State’s Attorney of the county in which such license was granted. Six days’ notice in writing of the hearing on such application shall be given to the person licensed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.